Wisconsin, session 2025, AB846.
do enact as follows:AB846,11Section 1. Fiscal changes.AB846,2,72(1) Something Special from Wisconsin. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) 3for the appropriation to the department of agriculture, trade and consumer 4protection under s. 20.115 (3) (L), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is 5increased by $200,000 and the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by 6$200,000 for the advertising and promotion of the something special from 7Wisconsin slogan, mark, and logo under s. 93.44.AB846,2,128(2) Buy Local, Buy Wisconsin grants. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) 9for the appropriation to the department of agriculture, trade and consumer 10protection under s. 20.115 (4) (am), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is 11increased by $300,000 and the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by 12$300,000 for the purpose of Buy Local, Buy Wisconsin grants.AB846,2,1313